Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
ARTICLE 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Cross references.

- Preservation of scenic or historic buildings, property, or land and water by means of facade and conservation easements or by means of municipal ordinances, T. 44, C. 10.

Limitation of liability of owners of property used for recreational purposes,

§

51-3-20

et seq.

Editor's notes.

- By resolution (Ga. L. 1987, p. 704), the General Assembly provided that the lodge and conference center to be constructed at Little Ocmulgee State Park in Wheeler County, Georgia be named and known as the "L.L. (Pete) Phillips Conference Center."

By resolution (Ga. L. 1988, p. 174), the General Assembly designated the state park on Lake Walter F. George in Clay County as the "George T. Bagby State Park."

By resolution (Ga. L. 1992, p. 3064), the General Assembly created the Walter F. George Tribute Commission, to be abolished when its purpose is accomplished.